Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 20 Child Support Notification

15-20-1.
Notification to and by employer.

With respect to any support order maintained and enforced under the Rhode Island Family Court/Department of Administration, division of taxation, Child Support Enforcement System (“CSE System”), the clerk of the family court and/or the department of administration, division of taxation shall notify the current employer of the obligor parent of the existence of such order. The director of the department shall, by regulation, prescribe the timing and the form of the notice and the information to be provided in the notice, and the form, timing, and content of all other notices required under this chapter.

Within ten (10) days of the termination of an obligor parent employee, the employer shall notify the department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement, of the termination of the employee, and the date of the termination.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 7.

15-20-2.
Duty of obligor parent to notify department.

When the obligor parent changes employers, the obligor parent shall promptly notify his or her subsequent employer of his or her order for child support and/or health insurance and shall notify the department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement, of his or her new employment, and the department shall transfer the assignment, garnishment, or the order for child support and/or health insurance to the subsequent employer.

If an assignment, garnishment, or order for child support and/or health insurance is in effect under this section but cannot be executed because the obligor parent has no employer, the department shall send the assignment, garnishment, or order for child support or health insurance to any employer who later employs the obligor as soon as the new employment is ascertained; provided, that the obligor parent’s obligation on the order shall continue, regardless of employment or lack of it, unless suspended by order of the family court.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 7.

15-20-3.
Penalties.

Failure by an obligor parent to comply with the provisions of this section shall be a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6.

15-20-4.
Duty of parent to notify department — Residence.

When the obligor parent and/or custodial parent change residence it shall be the duty of this parent to notify the department of the change of residence within ten (10) days.

This section applies to all cases brought pursuant to the Rhode Island state plan for child and spousal support, in conformance with title IV-D, part D of the Federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.

The procedures set forth in §

15-5-16.2(h)

relative to notice shall apply to all cases recorded with the Rhode Island family court/department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement system where services are not being provided under the state plan.

All notices and pleadings shall be mailed and/or served to the appropriate party at the most recent address of record.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 8.